Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,110
Noncompliance with commitment to affected community; revocation of license; when.

If the department receives information indicating that the acquiring person is not fulfilling the commitment to the affected community under section 71-20,109, the department shall hold a hearing upon ten days' notice to the affected parties. If after such hearing the department determines that the information is true, it may institute proceedings to revoke the license issued to the purchaser.

Laws 1996, LB 1188, § 9.